Utah statutes.
76-5-112.   Reckless endangerment -- Penalty.

(1)  A person commits reckless endangerment if, under circumstances not amounting to a felony offense, the person recklessly engages in conduct that creates a substantial risk of death or serious bodily injury to another person.

(2)  Reckless endangerment is a class A misdemeanor.



Enacted by Chapter 66, 1999 General Session

